Utah statutes.
16-17-206.   Change of registered agent by entity.
(1)  A represented entity may change the information currently on file under
Subsection 16-17-203(1) by filing with the division a statement of change
signed on behalf of the entity which states:
(a)  the name of the entity; and
(b)  the information that is to be in effect as a result of the filing of the
statement of change.
(2)  The interest holders or governors of a domestic entity need not approve
the filing of:
(a)  a statement of change under this section; or
(b)  a similar filing changing the registered agent or registered office of
the entity in any other jurisdiction.
(3)  The appointment of a registered agent pursuant to Subsection (1) is an
affirmation by the represented entity that the agent has consented to serve as
such.
(4)  A statement of change filed under this section takes effect on filing.
(5)  As an alternative to using the procedures in this section, a represented
entity may change the information currently on file under Subsection
16-17-203(1) by amending its most recent registered agent filing in the manner
provided by the laws of this state other than this chapter for amending that
filing.
